Utah statutes.
59-2-919.1.   Notice of property valuation and tax changes.
(1)  In addition to the notice requirements of Section 59-2-919, the county
auditor, on or before July 22 of each year, shall notify, by mail, each owner
of real estate as defined in Section 59-2-102 who is listed on the assessment
roll.
(2)  The notice described in Subsection (1) shall:
(a)  be sent to all owners of real property by mail not less than 10 days
before the day on which:
(i)  the county board of equalization meets; and
(ii)  the taxing entity holds a public hearing on the proposed increase in the
certified tax rate;
(b)  be printed on a form that is:
(i)  approved by the commission; and
(ii)  uniform in content in all counties in the state; and
(c)  contain for each property:
(i)  the value of the property;
(ii)  the date the county board of equalization will meet to hear complaints
on the valuation;
(iii)  itemized tax information for all taxing entities, including a separate
statement for the minimum school levy under Section 53A-17a-135 stating:
(A)  the dollar amount the taxpayer would have paid based on last year's rate;
and
(B)  the amount of the taxpayer's liability under the current rate;
(iv)  the tax impact on the property;
(v)  the time and place of the required public hearing for each entity;
(vi)  property tax information pertaining to:
(A)  taxpayer relief;
(B)  options for payment of taxes; and
(C)  collection procedures;
(vii)  information specifically authorized to be included on the notice under
Title 59, Chapter 2, Property Tax Act;
(viii)  the last property review date of the property as described in
Subsection 59-2-303.1(1)(c); and
(ix)  other property tax information approved by the commission.
